Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201944-2419
Order of liquidation; stay.

All proceedings arising out of a claim under a policy of insurance written by an insolvent insurer shall be stayed for one hundred twenty days from the date of entry of the order of liquidation to permit proper defense by the association of all such pending causes of action. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the powers of a receiver appointed pursuant to the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act or to stay any proceeding brought pursuant to such act.

Laws 2019, LB380, § 10.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.